Utah statutes.
17-24-1.   General duties of treasurer.

The county treasurer shall:

(1)  receive all money belonging to the county and all other money by law directed to be paid to the treasurer, including proceeds of bonds, notes, or other evidences of indebtedness issued under Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act;

(2)  deposit and invest all money received under Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act;

(3)  keep a record of the receipts and expenditures of all such money;

(4)  disburse county money:

(a)  on a county warrant issued by the county auditor; or

(b)  subject to Sections 17-19-1, 17-19-3, and 17-19-5, by a county check or such other payment mechanism as may be adopted pursuant to Chapter 36, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Counties;

(5)  perform the duties assigned to the treasurer under Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 13, Collection of Taxes;

(6)  perform the duties under Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 13, Collection of Taxes, that have been reassigned to the treasurer in an ordinance adopted under Section 17-16-5.5; and

(7)  perform other duties that are required by law or ordinance.

